Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF36.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1539YH (2) 91 je/ko H.F. 36 Section 1. Section 17A.19, subsection 10, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. Based upon an erroneous interpretation of a provision 3 of law whose interpretation has not clearly been vested by a 4 provision of law in the discretion of the agency . 5 Sec. 2. Section 17A.19, subsection 10, paragraph l, Code 6 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 7 Sec. 3. Section 17A.19, subsection 11, Code 2025, is amended 8 by striking the subsection. 9 Sec. 4. Section 17A.23, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 10 following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Notwithstanding any provision of the 12 Code to the contrary, a court, or a presiding officer in a 13 contested case or other administrative action subject to this 14 chapter, when interpreting a state statute or a rule or other 15 agency document subject to this chapter, shall not defer to 16 an agencyâs interpretation of the statute, rule, or document, 17 and must instead interpret its meaning and effect de novo. 18 In an action brought by or against an agency, the court or 19 officer, after applying all customary tools of interpretation, 20 must exercise any remaining doubt in favor of a reasonable 21 interpretation that limits agency authority. 22